src/main/resources/plurals.aff
SFX Z Y 127
SFX Z   а         ат        .
SFX Z   а         ели       .
SFX Z   а         елите     .
SFX Z   а         ени       .
SFX Z   а         ените     .
SFX Z   а         яха       .
SFX Z   м         дат       .
SFX Z   м         дели      .
SFX Z   м         делите    .
SFX Z   м         дени      .
SFX Z   м         дените    .
SFX Z   м         дещи      .
SFX Z   м         дещите    .
SFX Z   м         доха      .
SFX Z   м         дяха      .
SFX Z   м         ли        .
SFX Z   м         лите      .
SFX Z   я         ели       .
SFX Z   я         елите     .
SFX Z   я         еха       .
SFX Z   я         ещи       .
SFX Z   я         ещите     .
SFX Z   я         яли       .
SFX Z   я         ялите     .
SFX Z   я         ят        .
SFX Z   я         яха       .
